Utah statutes.
38-1b-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Alternate means" has the same meaning as defined in Section 38-1a-102.

(2)  "Construction project" has the same meaning as defined in Section 38-1a-102.

(3)  "Construction work" has the same meaning as defined in Section 38-1a-102.

(4)  "Designated agent" has the same meaning as defined in Section 38-1a-102.

(5)  "Division" means the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing created in Section 58-1-103.

(6)  "Government project" means a construction project undertaken by or for:

(a)  the state, including a department, division, or other agency of the state; or

(b)  a county, city, town, school district, local district, special service district, community development and renewal agency, or other political subdivision of the state.

(7)  "Government project-identifying information" means:

(a)  the lot or parcel number of each lot included in the project property that has a lot or parcel number; or

(b)  the unique project number assigned by the designated agent.

(8)  "Original contractor" has the same meaning as defined in Section 38-1a-102.

(9)  "Owner" has the same meaning as defined in Section 38-1a-102.

(10)  "Owner-builder" has the same meaning as defined in Section 38-1a-102.

(11)  "Private project" means a construction project that is not a government project.

(12)  "Project property" has the same meaning as defined in Section 38-1a-102.

(13)  "Registry" has the same meaning as defined in Section 38-1a-102.



Enacted by Chapter 278, 2012 General Session

